California, session 20252026, AB436.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. Section 65040.19 is added to the Government Code, to read:65040.19. (a) On or before June 1, 2027, the office shall develop, in consultation with the Department of Resources Recycling and Recovery, and post on the office’s internet website, a technical advisory, reflecting best practices to facilitate the siting of composting facilities to meet the organic waste reduction goals established in Section 39730.6 of the Health and Safety Code.(b) The technical advisory developed pursuant to subdivision (a) shall include both of the following, which shall be suitable for adoption or modification by a city, county, or city and county:(1) Sample general plan goals, policies, and implementation measures.(2) A model ordinance.(c) The office shall consult with representatives of urban, suburban, and rural counties and cities, operators of composting facilities, and private and public waste services throughout the development of the technical advisory.SEC. 2. Section 65302.16 is added to the Government Code, to read:65302.16. (a) Upon a substantive revision of the land use element on or after January 1, 2029, a city, county, or city and county shall consider both of the following:(1) The best practices practices, sample general plan, and model ordinance reflected in the technical advisory.(2) Updating the land use element to identify areas where composting facilities may be appropriate as an allowable use, which may vary based on different types or sizes of composting facilities.(b) Subdivision (a) shall only apply to revisions of a land use element that occur after the Office of Planning and Research Land Use and Climate Innovation publicly posts the technical advisory required by Section 65040.19.SEC. 3. No reimbursement is required by this act pursuant to Section 6 of Article XIII B of the California Constitution because a local agency or school district has the authority to levy service charges, fees, or assessments sufficient to pay for the program or level of service mandated by this act, within the meaning of Section 17556 of the Government Code.